Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-814
Taxes; warrant of city clerk; authority of city treasurer.

Any warrant issued pursuant to section 15-813 shall fully authorize and empower the city treasurer of the city of the primary class to levy on any personal property belonging to such delinquent, and such warrant shall be a full and complete justification of the city treasurer in any action brought to recover damages or costs for any act or proceeding by the city treasurer done or taken in conformity with the commands thereof.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 84, p. 102;

R.S.1913, § 4558;

C.S.1922, § 3945;

C.S.1929, § 15-816;

R.S.1943, § 15-814;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 137.